California, session 20252026, AB2694.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 78042 of the Education Code is amended to read:78042. (a) A district shall seek approval to offer baccalaureate degree programs through the appropriate accreditation body.(b) When seeking approval from the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, a district shall maintain the primary mission of the California Community Colleges specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 66010.4. The district, as part of the baccalaureate degree program, shall have the additional mission to provide high-quality undergraduate education at an affordable price for students and the state.(c) As a condition of eligibility for consideration to participate in the statewide baccalaureate degree program, a district shall do both of the following:(1) Have a written policy that requires all potential students who wish to apply for a Board of Governors Fee Waiver pursuant to Section 76300 to complete and submit either a Free Application for Federal Student Aid or a California Dream Act Application in lieu of completing the Board of Governors Fee Waiver application.(2) Satisfy one of the following attainment eligibility requirements: (A) Demonstrate, in its application, that it meets or exceeds performance benchmarks and goals for associate degree and certificate completion, as established by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.(B) If the district has not yet met the benchmarks and goals for associate degree programs pursuant to subparagraph (A), submit a board-adopted improvement plan with measurable milestones consistent with the district’s obligations under the strategic plan of the California Community Colleges.(d) A district’s baccalaureate degree program shall be subject to the following limitations:(1) A district shall identify and document unmet workforce needs in the subject area of the baccalaureate degree to be offered and offer a baccalaureate degree at a campus in a subject area with unmet workforce needs in the local community or region of the district.(2) A baccalaureate degree program shall not offer a baccalaureate degree program or program curricula substantially similar to a baccalaureate degree program offered by the California State University or the University of California within the geographic region served by the community college district, except where the California State University or the University of California does not enroll students from that geographic region in the same degree pathway or where documented unmet regional workforce needs justify the program.(3) A district shall have the expertise, resources, and student interest to offer a quality baccalaureate degree in the chosen field of study.(e) A district shall maintain separate records for students who are enrolled in courses classified in the upper division and lower division of a baccalaureate degree program. A student shall be reported as a community college student for enrollment in a lower division course and as a baccalaureate degree program student for enrollment in an upper division course.(f) A governing board of a district seeking authorization to offer a baccalaureate degree program shall submit all of the following for review by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and approval by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges:(1) Documentation of the district’s written policy required by subdivision (c).(2) The administrative plan for the baccalaureate degree program, including, but not limited to, the governing board of the district’s funding plan for its specific district.(3) A description of the baccalaureate degree program’s curriculum, faculty, and facilities.(4) The enrollment projections for the baccalaureate degree program.(5) Documentation regarding unmet workforce needs specifically related to the proposed baccalaureate degree program, and a written statement supporting the necessity of a four-year degree for that program. The documentation regarding unmet workforce needs shall include all of the following:(A) Evidence that the district consulted with regional employers and regional workforce development boards.(B) Statewide and regional workforce data relevant to the proposed baccalaureate degree program.(C) Evidence that the baccalaureate degree to be offered will help address unmet workforce needs. The evidence may include, but is not limited to, information showing the following:(i) Employers are having difficulty filling positions that require a baccalaureate degree.(ii) Employers are willing to pay baccalaureate degree holders more than those with a related associate degree or no postsecondary degree.(iii) Employers have a preference for candidates with the proposed baccalaureate degree.(6) Documentation of consultation with the California State University and the University of California regarding collaborative approaches to meeting regional workforce needs.(7) Documentation demonstrating that the district meets the attainment eligibility requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), including the performance benchmarks and goals for associate degree and certificate completion for the district or, where applicable, the board-adopted improvement plan. (g) (1) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall develop, and adopt by regulation, a funding model for the support of the statewide baccalaureate degree program that is based on a calculation of the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in all district baccalaureate degree programs.(2) Funding for each full-time equivalent student shall be at a marginal cost calculation, as determined by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, that shall not exceed the community college credit instruction marginal cost calculation for a full-time equivalent student, as determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 84750.5.(3) A student in a baccalaureate degree program authorized by this article shall not be charged fees higher than the mandatory systemwide fees charged for baccalaureate degree programs at the California State University.(4) Fees for coursework in a baccalaureate degree program shall be consistent with Article 1 (commencing with Section 76300) of Chapter 2 of Part 47.(5) A district shall, in addition to the fees charged pursuant to paragraph (4), charge a fee for upper division coursework in a baccalaureate degree program of eighty-four dollars ($84) per unit.(h) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall ensure all of the following for the application and review process for community college districts to participate in the baccalaureate degree program:(1) A community college district is provided with two timelines in which to apply for a baccalaureate degree program per year. A community college district may submit an application to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges by no later than January 15 and shall receive notice of approval or rejection on or before May 31. A community college district may submit an application to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges by no later than August 15 and shall receive notice of approval or rejection on or before December 31.(2) Only 15 baccalaureate degree programs are approved during each application period, allowing for a total of 30 approved baccalaureate degree programs per academic year.(3) The total number of baccalaureate degree programs offered by a community college district, at any time, does not exceed 15 percent of the total number of associate degree programs offered by the community college district, including associate degrees for transfer.(4) The review process takes no less than 30 days from the receipt of a completed application to validate the information submitted and assess the workforce value of the proposed program by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(i) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consult with and seek feedback from the Chancellor of the California State University and the President of the University of California regarding proposed baccalaureate degree programs that may be substantially similar to California State University or University of California programs offered within the geographic region of the proposing community college district. If the California State University or the University of California believe there is substantial similarity within the geographic region, they may submit a written objection with supporting evidence. Upon receipt of an objection, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall convene the applicant and the objector to establish a written agreement before the program is approved.(j) (1) A community college district shall continue to offer an associate degree program in the same academic subject for which a baccalaureate degree program has been approved, unless that community college district has received approval from the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to eliminate the associate degree program.(2) When conducting a review to approve the elimination of an associate degree program, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall evaluate both of the following:(A) Changes to the labor market viability of the associate degree.(B) Changes to the minimum education required to maintain program accreditation.(k) (1) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall annually report to the Legislature, no later than March 1, on the status of all baccalaureate degree programs approved under this article.(2) The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information for each approved program: (A) The name of the district and program.(B) Evidence that the campus meets or exceeds the benchmarks and goals for associate degree and certificate completion or a copy of the campus’ board-adopted improvement plan pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). (C) Whether a collaborative program was pursued and the outcome.(D) Any objections received from the California State University or the University of California and the written agreements reached.(E) Enrollment data.(F) Student outcome data, including completion rates and employment outcomes disaggregated by race, gender, income, and first-generation student status.(3) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(l) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1) “Documented unmet regional workforce need” means evidence, as defined by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, evidence showing demand for graduates in the field that is not met by existing baccalaureate degree programs within the geographic region. region, as demonstrated through labor market analyses prepared by the California Community Colleges Center of Excellence for Labor Market Research using labor market information and analyses published by the Labor and Workforce Development Agency. The labor market analyses shall consider projected employment demand, annual job openings, workforce supply, employer demand, wage data, and other indicators relevant to the proposed baccalaureate degree program.(2) “Geographic region” means the primary service area of the community college district as defined by Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations or as otherwise defined by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(3) “Substantially similar” means that the proposed baccalaureate degree program’s curriculum, learning outcomes, and program objectives are materially overlapping with those of an existing California State University or University of California baccalaureate degree program offered within the geographic region of the community college district such that the programs serve indistinguishable academic and workforce purposes.